California statutes. Water Code
(3) For the purpose of developing the general permit and establishing eligibility criteria to carry out paragraph (1), the state board shall hold at least one workshop and shall consult with and consider comments from the regional boards, groundwater management agencies and water replenishment districts with statutory authority to manage groundwater pursuant to their principal act, and any interested party.

(4) The general permit shall include language that provides for the modification of the terms and conditions of the general permit if a regulatory or statutory change occurs that affects the application of the general permit or as necessary to ensure protection of beneficial uses.

(b) The state board shall establish a reasonable schedule of fees to reimburse the state board for the costs it incurs in implementing, developing, and administering this section.

(c) Following the adoption of the general permit pursuant to this section, an applicant may obtain coverage for a landscape irrigation use of recycled water by filing a notice of intent to be covered under the general permit and submitting the appropriate fee established pursuant to subdivision (b) to the state board.

(d) Coverage under the general permit adopted pursuant to this section is effective if all of the following apply:

(1) The applicant has submitted a completed application.

(2) The state board has determined that the applicant meets the eligibility criteria established pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(3) The state board has made the application available for public review and comment for 30 days.

(4) The state board has consulted with the appropriate regional board.

(5) The executive officer of the state board approves the application.

(e) (1) Except as provided by modification of the general permit, a person eligible for coverage under the general permit pursuant to subdivision (d) is not required to become or remain subject to individual waste discharge requirements or water reclamation requirements.

(2) For a landscape irrigation use of recycled water, a person who is subject to general or individual waste discharge requirements prescribed pursuant to Section 13263 or 13377, or is subject to individual or master water reclamation requirements prescribed pursuant to Section 13523 or 13523.1, may apply for coverage under the general permit adopted pursuant to this section in lieu of remaining subject to requirements prescribed pursuant to those sections.

(f) (1) The state board shall designate an ombudsperson to coordinate and facilitate communication on recycled water, on the issuance of water reclamation requirements or waste discharge requirements, as applicable, pursuant to Section 13523 or 13523.1 or this section, and on the promotion of water recycling while ensuring reasonable protection of water quality in accordance with applicable provisions of state and federal water quality law.

(2) The person appointed pursuant to paragraph (1) shall facilitate consultations between the state board and the regional boards relating to matters described in that paragraph.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 535, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

13552.6.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the use of potable domestic water for floor trap priming, cooling towers, and air-conditioning devices is a waste or an unreasonable use of water within the meaning of Section 2 of Article X of the California Constitution if recycled water, for these uses, is available to the user, and the water meets the requirements set forth in Section 13550, as determined by the state board after notice and a hearing.

(b) The state board may require a public agency or person subject to this section to submit information that the state board determines may be relevant in making the determination required in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 28, Sec. 43.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

13552.8.

(a) Any public agency, including a state agency, city, county, city and county, district, or any other political subdivision of the state, may require the use of recycled water in floor trap priming, cooling towers, and air-conditioning devices, if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) Recycled water, for these uses, is available to the user and meets the requirements set forth in Section 13550, as determined by the state board after notice and a hearing.

(2) The use of recycled water does not cause any loss or diminution of any existing water right.

(3) If public exposure to aerosols, mist, or spray may occur, appropriate mist mitigation or mist control is provided, such as the use of mist arrestors or the addition of biocides to the water in accordance with criteria established pursuant to Section 13521.

(4) The person intending to use recycled water has prepared an engineering report pursuant to Section 60323 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations that includes plumbing design, cross-connection control, and monitoring requirements for the public agency, which are in compliance with criteria established pursuant to Section 13521.

(b) This section applies to both of the following:

(1) New
 industrial facilities and subdivisions for which the building permit is issued on or after March 15, 1994, or, if a building permit is not required, new structures for which construction begins on or after March 15, 1994, for which the State Department of Public Health has approved the use of recycled water.

(2) Any structure that is retrofitted to permit the use of recycled water for floor traps, cooling towers, or air-conditioning devices, for which the State Department of Public Health has approved the use of recycled water.

(c) (1) Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code does not apply to any project which only involves the repiping, redesign, or use of recycled water for floor trap priming, cooling towers, or
 air-conditioning devices necessary to comply with a requirement prescribed by a public agency under subdivision (a).

(2) The exemption in paragraph (1) does not apply to any project to develop recycled water, to construct conveyance facilities for recycled water, or any other project not specified in this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 544, Sec. 15.   (SB 1458)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

13553.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the use of potable domestic water for toilet and urinal flushing in structures is a waste or an unreasonable use of water within the meaning of Section 2 of Article X of the California Constitution if recycled water, for these uses, is available to the user and meets the requirements set forth in Section 13550, as determined by the state board after notice and a hearing.

(b) The state board may require a public agency or person subject to this section to furnish any information that may be relevant to making the determination required in subdivision (a).

(c) For purposes of this section and Section 13554, “structure” or “structures” means commercial,
 retail, and office buildings, theaters, auditoriums, condominium projects, schools, hotels, apartments, barracks, dormitories, jails, prisons, food handling and processing facilities, reformatories, and other structures as determined by the state board.

(d) Recycled water may be used in condominium projects, as defined in Section 4125 or 6542 of the Civil Code, subject to all of the following conditions:

(1) Prior to the indoor use of recycled water in any condominium project, the agency delivering the recycled water to the condominium project shall file a report with, and receive written approval of the report from, the
 state board.
 The report shall be consistent with the provisions of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations generally applicable to dual-plumbed structures and shall include all the following:

(A) That potable water service to each condominium project will be provided with a backflow protection device approved by the state board to protect the agency’s public water system, as defined in Section 116275 of the Health and Safety Code. The backflow protection device approved by the
 state board shall be inspected and tested annually by a person certified in the inspection of backflow prevention devices.

(B) That any plumbing modifications in the condominium unit or any physical alteration of the structure will be done in compliance with state and local plumbing codes.

(C) That each condominium project will be tested by the recycled water agency or the responsible local agency at least once every four years to ensure that there are no indications of a possible cross connection between the condominium’s potable and nonpotable systems.

(D) That recycled water lines will be color coded consistent with current statutes and regulations.

(2) The recycled water agency or the responsible local agency
 shall maintain records of all tests and annual inspections conducted.

(3) The condominium’s declaration, as defined in Section 4135 or 6546 of the Civil Code, shall provide that the laws and regulations governing recycled water apply, shall not permit any exceptions to those laws and regulations, shall incorporate the report described in paragraph (1), and shall contain the following statement:
“NOTICE OF USE OF RECYCLED WATER
This property is approved by the State
 Water Resources Control Board for the use of recycled water for toilet and urinal flushing. This water is not potable, is not suitable for indoor purposes other than toilet and urinal flushing purposes, and requires dual plumbing. Alterations and modifications to the plumbing system require a permit and are prohibited without first consulting with the appropriate local building code enforcement agency and your property management company or owners’ association to ensure that the recycled water is not mixed with the drinking water.”
(e) The state board may adopt regulations as necessary to assist in the implementation of this section.

(f) This section shall only apply to condominium projects that are created, within the meaning of Section 4030 or 6580 of the Civil Code, on or after January 1, 2008.

(g) This section and Section 13554 do not apply to a pilot program adopted pursuant to Section 13553.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 736, Sec. 5.   (SB 31)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

13553.1.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that certain coastal areas of the state have been using sea water to flush toilets and urinals as a means of conserving potable water; that this practice precludes the beneficial reuse of treated wastewater and has had a deleterious effect on the proper wastewater treatment process, and has led to corrosion of the sea water distribution pipelines and wastewater collection systems; and that this situation must be changed.

(b) There is a need for a pilot program to demonstrate that conversion to the use of recycled water in residential buildings for toilet and urinal flushing does not pose a
 threat to public health and safety.

(c) A city that is providing a separate distribution system for sea water for use in flushing toilets and urinals in residential structures may, by ordinance, authorize the use of recycled water for the flushing of toilets and urinals in residential structures if the level of treatment and the use of the recycled water meets the criteria set by the State Department of Public Health.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 544, Sec. 16.   (SB 1458)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

13554.

(a) Any public agency, including a state agency, city, county, city and county, district, or any other political subdivision of the state, may require the use of recycled water for toilet and urinal flushing in structures, except a mental hospital or other facility operated by a public agency for the treatment of persons with mental disorders, if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) Recycled water, for these uses, is available to the user and meets the requirements set forth in Section 13550, as determined by the state board after notice and a hearing.

(2) The use of recycled water does not cause any loss or diminution of any existing water right.

(3) The public agency has prepared an engineering report pursuant to Section 60323 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations that includes plumbing design, cross-connection control, and monitoring requirements for the use site, which are in compliance with criteria established pursuant to Section 13521.

(b) This section applies only to either of the following:

(1) New structures for which the building permit is issued on or after March 15, 1992, or, if a building permit is not required, new structures for which construction begins on or after March 15, 1992.

(2) Any construction pursuant to subdivision (a) for which the State Department of Public Health has, before January 1, 1992, approved the use of recycled water.

(c) Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code does not apply to any project which only involves the repiping, redesign, or use of recycled water by a structure necessary to comply with a requirement issued by a public agency under subdivision (a). This exemption does not apply to any project to develop recycled water, to construct conveyance facilities for recycled water, or any other project not specified in this subdivision.

(d) (1) Recycled water for toilet or urinal flushing or outdoor irrigation shall be permissible in and around food handling or processing facilities, commercial, institutional, and industrial buildings, and cafeterias, provided the recycled water does not enter the room where food handling or processing occurs.

(2) Closed piping conveying
 recycled water may pass through the room where food handling or processing occurs.

(3) Outdoor irrigation with recycled water at facilities that handle or process food outside is prohibited while food is being handled or processed outside.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 736, Sec. 6.   (SB 31)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

13554.2.

(a) Any person or entity proposing the use of recycled water shall reimburse the State Department of Public Health for reasonable costs that department actually incurs in performing duties pursuant to this chapter.

(b) (1) Upon a request from the person or entity proposing the use of recycled water, the State Department of
 Public Health shall, within a reasonable time after the receipt of the request, provide an estimate of the costs that it will reasonably incur in the performance of its duties pursuant to this chapter.

(2) For purposes of implementing subdivision (a), that department shall maintain a record of its costs. In determining those costs, that department may consider costs that include, but are not limited to, costs relating to personnel requirements, materials, travel, and office overhead. The amount of reimbursement shall be equal to, and may not exceed, that department’s actual costs.

(c) With the consent of the person or entity proposing the use of recycled water, the State Department of Public Health may delegate all or part of the duties that department performs
 pursuant to this chapter within a county to a local health agency authorized by the board of supervisors to assume these duties, if, in the judgment of that department, the local health agency can perform these duties. Any person or entity proposing the use of recycled water shall reimburse the local health agency for reasonable costs that the local health agency actually incurs in the performance of its duties delegated pursuant to this subdivision.

(d) (1) Upon a request from the person or entity proposing the use of recycled water, the local health agency shall, within a reasonable time after the receipt of the request, provide an estimate of the cost it will reasonably incur in the performance of its duties delegated under subdivision (c).

(2) The local health
 agency, if delegated duties pursuant to subdivision (c), shall maintain a record of its costs that include, but is not limited to, costs relating to personnel requirements, materials, travel, and office overhead. The amount of reimbursement shall be equal to, and may not exceed, the local health agency’s actual costs.

(e) The State Department of Public Health or local health agency shall complete its review of a proposed use of recycled water within a reasonable period of time. That department shall submit to the person or entity proposing the use of recycled water a written determination as to whether the proposal submitted is complete for purposes of review within 30 days from the date of receipt of the proposal and shall approve or disapprove the proposed use within 30 days from the date on which that department determines that the
 proposal is complete.

(f) An invoice for reimbursement of services rendered shall be submitted to the person or entity proposing the use of recycled water subsequent to completion of review of the proposed use, or other services rendered, that specifies the number of hours spent by the State Department of Public Health or local health agency, specific tasks performed, and other costs actually incurred. Supporting documentation, including receipts, logs, timesheets, and other standard accounting documents, shall be maintained by that department or local health agency and copies, upon request, shall be provided to the person or entity proposing the use of recycled water.

(g) For the purposes of this section, “person or entity proposing the use of recycled water” means the producer
 or distributor of recycled water submitting a proposal to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 544, Sec. 18.   (SB 1458)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

13554.3.

The State Water Resources Control Board may establish a reasonable schedule of fees by which it is reimbursed for the costs it incurs pursuant to Sections 13553 and 13554.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 723, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

13555.2.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that many local agencies deliver recycled water for nonpotable uses and that the use of recycled water is an effective means of meeting the demands for new water caused by drought conditions or population increases in the state. It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage the design and construction of water delivery systems on private property that deliver water for both potable and nonpotable uses in separate pipelines.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 28, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

13555.3.

(a) Water delivery systems on private property that could deliver recycled water for nonpotable uses described in Section 13550, that are constructed on and after January 1, 1993, shall be designed to ensure that the water to be used for only potable domestic uses is delivered, from the point of entry to the private property to be served, in a separate pipeline which is not used to deliver the recycled water.

(b) This section applies to water delivery systems on private property constructed within either of the following jurisdictions:

(1) One that has an urban water management plan that includes the intent to develop recycled water use.

(2) One that does not have an urban water management plan that includes recycled water use, but that is within five miles of a jurisdiction that does have an urban water management plan that includes recycled water use, and has indicated a willingness to serve the water delivery system.

(c) This section does not preempt local regulation of the delivery of water for potable and nonpotable uses and any local governing body may adopt requirements which are more restrictive than the requirements of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 28, Sec. 48.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

13555.5.

(a) If a recycled water producer determines that within 10 years the recycled water producer proposes to provide recycled water for use for state landscape irrigation that meets all of the conditions set forth in Section 13550, the recycled water producer shall so notify the Department of Transportation and the Department of General Services, and shall identify in the notice the area that is eligible to receive the recycled water, and the necessary infrastructure that the recycled water producer or the retail water supplier proposes to provide, to facilitate delivery of the recycled water.

(b) If notice has been provided pursuant to subdivision (a), all pipe installed by the Department of Transportation or the Department of General Services for landscape irrigation within the identified area shall be of the type necessary to meet the requirements of Section 116815 of the Health and Safety Code and applicable regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 541, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

13556.

In addition to any other authority provided in law, any water supplier described in subdivision (b) of Section 1745 may acquire, store, provide, sell, and deliver recycled water for any beneficial use, including, but not limited to, municipal, industrial, domestic, and irrigation uses, if the water use is in accordance with statewide recycling criteria and regulations established pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 28, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

13557.

(a) On or before December 31, 2009, the department, in consultation with the State Department of Public Health, shall adopt and submit to the California Building Standards Commission regulations to establish a state version of Chapter 16 of the Uniform Plumbing Code adopted by the International Association of Plumbing and Mechanical Officials to provide design standards to safely plumb
 buildings with both potable and recycled water systems.

(b) Commencing July 1, 2011, and annually thereafter, the department shall review and update, as necessary, the regulations developed pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) This section shall be exempt from the provisions of Section 161.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 178, Sec. 1.   (SB 283)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Water Quality Criteria for Onsite Treated Nonpotable Water Systems [13558. - 13558.1.]

13558.

(a) On or before December 1, 2022, the state board, in consultation with the California Building Standards Commission and the Department of Housing and Community Development, shall adopt regulations for risk-based water quality standards for the onsite treatment and reuse of nonpotable water for nonpotable end uses in multifamily residential, commercial, and mixed-use buildings. The state board shall address in those regulations, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) Risk-based log reduction targets for the removal of pathogens such as enteric viruses, parasitic protozoa, and enteric bacteria for nonpotable water sources, graywater, rainwater, stormwater, and blackwater, and nonpotable end uses, toilet and urinal flushing, clothes washing, irrigation, and dust
 suppression.

(2) Water quality monitoring requirements.

(3) Reporting requirements for the water quality monitoring results.

(4) Notification and public information requirements.

(5) Cross-connection controls.

(b) A local jurisdiction that elects to establish a program for onsite treated nonpotable water systems shall do all of the following:

(1) (A) Adopt a local program through a local ordinance that includes the risk-based water quality standards established by the state board.

(B) (i) A local jurisdiction that does
 not provide water service or sewer service shall consult with a water service provider or sewer service provider, respectively, that provides water service or sewer service within the boundaries of the jurisdiction before adopting, amending, or repealing an ordinance that institutes a program for onsite treated nonpotable water system installation and regulation. In consulting with a water service provider or sewer service provider, a local jurisdiction shall give the water service provider or sewer service provider the opportunity to demonstrate that the proposed ordinance could result in a significant adverse impact to any of the following:

(I) Operations, maintenance, or management of the existing sewer collection or treatment system due to reduced flows.

(II) Existing or planned centralized recycled water or potable reuse facilities or projects due to reduced flows.

(III) Receiving waters.

(ii) If a water service provider or sewer service provider demonstrates to a local jurisdiction a significant risk of a significant adverse impact listed in clause (i), the local jurisdiction shall avoid the impacts or mitigate the impacts to a point where no significant impact on the system, facilities, projects, or receiving waters would occur before adopting the proposed ordinance.

(2) Establish onsite treated nonpotable water system design criteria, permitting, cross-connection control, and enforcement procedures.

(3) Provide an annual report to the state board that includes the number, location, and description of permits issued for new and replacement onsite treated nonpotable water systems, the types and quantity of
 nonpotable water for nonpotable end uses, water quality monitoring data, and a summary of any violations and corrective actions taken in the local jurisdiction’s program.

(4) Terminate the operation of, and modify to render inoperable, any onsite treated nonpotable water system at the direction of the state board.

(5) (A) Implement its program for the protection of public health.

(B) (i) If a local jurisdiction determines that it can no longer effectively implement its program while protecting public health, or if it decides to terminate its program, the local jurisdiction shall rescind its issued permits and require all installed systems to be rendered inoperable prior to the cessation of its program.

(ii) Before a local jurisdiction terminates its program pursuant to this subparagraph, it shall publicly state the financial or logistical hardship that justifies termination of the program and provide the public with an opportunity for comment.

(C) The state board shall not administer a local jurisdiction’s program in place of a local jurisdiction that is unable to effectively implement its program while protecting public health or that decides to terminate its program.

(c) The standards established pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not address untreated graywater systems that are used exclusively for subsurface irrigation that are regulated by Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 1501.0) of the California Plumbing Code (Part 5 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations).

(d) The standards
 established pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not address untreated rainwater systems that are used exclusively for surface, subsurface, or drip irrigation that are regulated by Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 1601.0) of the California Plumbing Code (Part 5 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations).

(e) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the standards established pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be considered building standards and shall be treated as program regulations promulgated pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(2) Within 12 months of the state board adopting regulations pursuant to subdivision (a), the Department of Housing and Community Development, in consultation with the state board, shall develop and propose for adoption any necessary corresponding
 building standards to support the risk-based water quality standards established by the state board pursuant to subdivision (a).

(f) The standards established pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be effective commencing on the date on which the regulations are approved and final. An onsite treated nonpotable water system in operation before the effective date of the regulations shall comply with the regulations within two years of the effective date. If the permitting local jurisdiction finds that the permittee is working to come into compliance with the regulations, but due to extenuating circumstances related to the engineering, repair, or replacement of the system a further extension is warranted, the local jurisdiction may grant an extension to comply with the regulations not to exceed five years after the effective date.

(g) The state board may contract with public or private
 entities to advise the state board on public health issues and scientific and technical matters regarding the content of the standards established pursuant to subdivision (a).

(h) For purposes of this section, “local jurisdiction” means a city, county, or city and county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 884, Sec. 5.   (SB 745)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

13558.1.

(a) An onsite treated nonpotable water system shall not be installed except under a program established in compliance with subdivision (b) of Section 13558.

(b) This section does not apply to untreated graywater systems that are used exclusively for subsurface irrigation that are regulated by Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 1501.0) of the California Plumbing Code (Part 5 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations).

(c) This section does not apply to untreated rainwater systems that are used exclusively for surface, subsurface, or drip irrigation that are regulated by Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 1601.0) of the California Plumbing Code (Part 5 of Title 24 of the
 California Code of Regulations).

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 890, Sec. 1.   (SB 966)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7.3. Potable Reuse [13560. - 13570.]

13560.

The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(a) In February 2009, the state board unanimously adopted, as Resolution No. 2009-0011, an updated water recycling policy, which includes the goal of increasing the use of recycled water in the state over 2002 levels by at least 1,000,000 acre-feet per year by 2020 and by at least 2,000,000 acre-feet per year by 2030.

(b) Section 13521 requires the department to establish uniform statewide recycling criteria for each varying type of use of recycled water where the use involves the protection of public health.

(c) Achievement of the state’s goals depends on the timely development of uniform statewide recycling
 criteria for potable water reuse and of a clear pathway for approval of potable reuse projects.

(d) This chapter is not intended to delay, invalidate, or reverse any study or project, or development of regulations by the department, the state board, or the regional boards regarding the use of recycled water for potable reuse.

(e) This chapter shall not be construed to delay, invalidate, or reverse the state board’s ongoing review of projects consistent with Section 116551 of the Health and Safety Code.

(f) The water recycling goals of 700,000 acre-feet of water per year by the year 2000 and 1,000,000 acre-feet of water per year by the year 2010, established in Section 13577, have not been met.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage the
 development of potable reuse to mitigate the impact of long-term drought and climate change.

(h) A 2014 report by the WateReuse Research Foundation, “The Opportunities and Economics of Direct Potable Reuse” found that potable reuse could provide up to 1.1 million acre-feet per year of new drinking water supplies for California. 

(i) The state board adopted uniform water recycling criteria for the replenishment of groundwater basins in June 2014 and is developing uniform water recycling criteria for the augmentation of surface water reservoirs pursuant to Section 13562.

(j) The state board report to the Legislature, “Investigation on the Feasibility of Developing Uniform Water Recycling Criteria for Direct Potable Reuse,” found that it is feasible to develop uniform water recycling criteria for direct potable reuse
 that is protective of public health.

(k) The state board report to the Legislature stated that the state board should develop a common framework across various types of direct potable reuse projects to help avoid discontinuities in the risk assessment and then sequentially develop uniform water recycling criteria.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 528, Sec. 2.   (AB 574)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

13560.5.

The Legislature finds and declares that on or before June 1, 2018, the state board should establish a framework for the regulation of potable reuse projects. When establishing the framework, the state board should include all of the following:

(a) The consideration of recommendations provided in the state board’s “Investigation on the Feasibility of Developing Uniform Water Recycling Criteria for Direct Potable Reuse.”

(b) A schedule for completing the recommended research described in “Investigation on the Feasibility of Developing Uniform Water Recycling Criteria for Direct Potable Reuse.”

(c) A regulatory framework for potable reuse
 projects that will be protective of public health.

(d) A process and timeline for updating, if necessary, uniform water recycling criteria for potable reuse through reservoir water augmentation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 528, Sec. 3.   (AB 574)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

13561.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Department” or “state board” means the State Water Resources Control Board.

(b) “Direct potable reuse” means the planned introduction of recycled water either directly into a public water system, as defined in Section 116275 of the Health and Safety Code, or into a raw water supply immediately upstream of a water treatment plant. Direct potable reuse includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(1) “Raw water augmentation,” which means the planned placement of recycled water into a system of pipelines or aqueducts that deliver raw water to a drinking water treatment plant
 that provides water to a public water system, as defined in Section 116275 of the Health and Safety Code. 

(2) “Treated drinking water augmentation,” means the planned placement of recycled water into the water distribution system of a public water system, as defined in Section 116275 of the Health and Safety Code. 

(c) “Indirect potable reuse for groundwater recharge” means the planned use of recycled water for replenishment of a groundwater basin or an aquifer that has been designated as a source of water supply for a public water system, as defined in Section 116275 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) “Reservoir water augmentation” means the planned placement of recycled water into a raw surface water reservoir used as a source of domestic drinking water
 supply for a public water system, as defined in Section 116275 of the Health and Safety Code, or into a constructed system conveying water to such a reservoir.

(e) “Uniform water recycling criteria” has the same meaning as in Section 13521.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 528, Sec. 4.   (AB 574)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

13561.2.

(a) On or before December 31, 2023, the state board shall adopt uniform water recycling criteria for direct potable reuse through raw water augmentation. In adopting the initial uniform recycling criteria for direct potable reuse through raw water augmentation, the state board shall comply with all of the following:

(1) The state board shall develop the uniform water recycling criteria for direct potable reuse through raw water augmentation using information from the recommended research described in subdivision (b) of Section 13560.5 after soliciting stakeholder input from water agencies, wastewater agencies, local public health officers, environmental organizations, environmental justice organizations, public health nongovernmental
 organizations, and the business community.

(2) Before adopting uniform water recycling criteria for raw water augmentation, the state board shall submit the proposed criteria to the expert review panel established pursuant to subdivision (c). The expert review panel shall review the proposed criteria and shall adopt a finding as to whether, in its expert opinion, the proposed criteria would adequately protect public health.

(3) The state board shall not adopt uniform water recycling criteria for raw water augmentation pursuant to this subdivision unless and until the expert review panel adopts a finding that the proposed criteria would adequately protect public health.

(4) If the state board finds it will be unable to adopt the uniform water recycling criteria by December 31, 2023, the state board may, by June 30,
 2023, extend the uniform water recycling criteria deadline by up to 18 months.

(5) If the state board finds that it needs longer than the deadline that has been extended pursuant to paragraph (4), the state board shall do all of the following:

(A) Post on its Internet Web site the date by which it intends to adopt the uniform water recycling criteria.

 (B) If the state board determines that the recommended research described in subdivision (b) of Section 13560.5 is insufficient, consult with the expert review panel described in subdivision (c) regarding the research and, if necessary, the need for additional scientific and technical research. The expert review panel shall also determine the scientific and technical research necessary for the state board to complete the uniform water recycling criteria, including an
 estimated timeframe needed to conduct the scientific and technical research.

(C) No later than June 30, 2024, post on its Internet Web site the findings and determinations made, if any, by the expert review panel described in subdivision (c) under subparagraph (B).

(b) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the state board from using its existing authority to permit potable reuse projects pursuant to Section 116550 of the Health and Safety Code before the adoption of uniform recycling criteria pursuant to this section.

(c) (1) Before adopting the initial uniform water recycling criteria for direct potable reuse through raw
 water augmentation, the state board shall establish and administer an expert review panel for purposes of subdivision (a) and, if the state board deems it necessary, to provide additional scientific and technological research or to recommend a source of either existing research or research to be produced on direct potable reuse through raw water augmentation. After the state board has adopted the initial uniform water recycling criteria for raw water augmentation, the state board may reconvene or reestablish the expert review panel, if the state board deems it necessary, to provide additional scientific and technological research or to recommend a source of either existing research or research to be produced on raw water augmentation. In establishing
 and administering an expert review panel, the state board may contract with public or
 nonprofit research entities.
